Hawaii statutes.
[§10H-5] Native Hawaiian convention.
The publication of the roll of qualified Native Hawaiians, as provided in
section 10H‑4, is intended to facilitate the process under which
qualified Native Hawaiians may independently commence the organization of a convention
of qualified Native Hawaiians, established for the purpose of organizing
themselves. [L 2011, c 195, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next